src/morphology/affixes/particles.lexc
!! !!!Particles
!! ----
!! Komi Particles


LEXICON PCLE_
+Pcle: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PCLE_NEG
+Pcle+Neg: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PcleIntens
+Pcle+Intens: WordEnd ;

LEXICON ONOM_
+Onom: WordEnd ;

!LEXICON DESCR-End
! DescrTag ;
LEXICON DESCR_
+Descr: WordEnd ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
